Massachusetts, session 194th, H337.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1: Section 55 of chapter 112 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the second paragraph and replacing it thereof 
with the following paragraph:-  
Every registered veterinarian shall biannually, before January first, pay to the board a 
license fee to be determined annually by the commissioner of administration under the provision 
of section three B of chapter seven, in default of which the board may revoke the veterinarian’s 
license and authority to practice veterinary medicine thereunder, after a hearing as provided by 
section eleven; but the payment of said fee at or before the time of hearing, with an additional 
sum to be determined under the aforementioned chapter seven provision, shall remove the 
default. A veterinarian seeking license renewal shall present evidence satisfactory to the board of 

of 2 11 the successful completion of such continuing education as the board shall require by regulation. 
A veterinarian duly registered and licensed to practice in this commonwealth, whose license has 
not been revoked, but who shall have temporarily retired from practice or removed from the 
commonwealth for a period not exceeding five years, and shall have notified the board of such 
retirement or removal, may register upon paying the lapsed annual license fee and filing with the 
board an affidavit as to the facts aforesaid. Applications for renewals of licenses hereunder shall 
be upon forms prescribed by the board, and shall, no less than thirty days prior to January first 
every other year, be transmitted to each veterinarian registered with the board. 
SECTION 2: This Act shall become effective December 1, 2027.